praksid/praks1/maris-kodutöö1/maris.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N                ! Nimisõna
+A                ! Omadussõna
+Sg
+Pl
+Nom
+Gen
+Part
+Ill
+In
+El
+All              ! Alaleütlev
+Ad                 
+Abl
+Tr
+Term
+Es
+Abes
+Kom

LEXICON Root

kati+N:kati tüüp_pere ;    ! leksikaalne pool : pindesitus
karu+N:karu tüüp_ema ;
võru+N:võru tüüp_ema ;
käbi+N:käbi tüüp_ema ;

LEXICON tüüp_pere
    +Sg: pere_sg ;
    +Pl: pere_pl ;

LEXICON tüüp_ema
    +Sg: ema_sg ;
    +Pl: ema_pl ;
    
LEXICON pere_sg

    +Nom: # ;
    +Gen: # ;
    +Part:t # ;
    +Ill:sse # ;
    +In:s # ;
    +El:st # ;
    +All:le # ;
    +Ad:l # ;
    +Abl:lt # ;
    +Tr:ks # ;
    +Term:ni # ;
    +Es:na # ;
    +Abes:ta # ;
    +Kom:ga # ;
    
LEXICON pere_pl

    +Nom:d # ;
    +Gen:de # ;
    +Part:sid # ;
    +Ill:desse # ;
    +In:des # ;
    +El:dest # ;
    +All:dele # ;
    +Ad:del # ;
    +Abl:delt # ;
    +Tr:deks # ;
    +Term:deni # ;
    +Es:dena # ;
    +Abes:deta # ;
    +Kom:dega # ;

LEXICON ema_sg

    +Nom: # ;
    +Gen: # ;
    +Part: # ;
    +Ill:sse # ;
    +In:s # ;
    +El:st # ;
    +All:le # ;
    +Ad:l # ;
    +Abl:lt # ;
    +Tr:ks # ;
    +Term:ni # ;
    +Es:na # ;
    +Abes:ta # ;
    +Kom:ga # ;
    
LEXICON ema_pl

    +Nom:d # ;
    +Gen:de # ;
    +Part:sid # ;
    +Ill:desse # ;
    +In:des # ;
    +El:dest # ;
    +All:dele # ;
    +Ad:del # ;
    +Abl:delt # ;
    +Tr:deks # ;
    +Term:deni # ;
    +Es:dena # ;
    +Abes:deta # ;
    +Kom:dega # ;   
